California, session 20252026, AB2545.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9620 is added to the Unemployment Insurance Code, to read:9620. (a) The California Artificial Intelligence Worker Impact Data Assessment Project is hereby established within the department. (b) The California Artificial Intelligence Worker Impact Data Assessment Project Advisory Panel is hereby created and, on or before March 1, 2027, shall consist of 14 members appointed as follows:(1) Two experts of the University of California Labor Centers who lead research on employment, technology impacts on employment, and workforce development as appointed by the Governor.(2) Two experts from artificial intelligence developers who have assessed and analyzed technological impacts on labor markets appointed by the Governor.(3) Two experts from nonprofit organizations who have experience in assessing upward mobility, equity, worker development, worker training, or workplace evolution from the introduction of new technology appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(4) One expert from a bona fide labor organization representing workers in California, including public sector, private sector, or multisector organizations appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(5) One expert from a nonprofit organization who has experience in assessing upward mobility, equity, worker development, worker training, or workplace evolution from the introduction of new technology appointed by the Senate Rules Committee. Governor.(6) Two experts from bona fide labor organizations representing workers in California, including public sector, private sector, or multisector organizations appointed by the Senate Rules Committee.(7) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules representing a small small- or medium-sized private sector employer with demonstrated experience deploying artificial intelligence technologies or automated decisions systems in the workplace.(8) One member appointed by the Governor representing a large private sector employer with demonstrated experience in deploying artificial intelligence technologies or automated decisions systems in the workplace.(9) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly representing a nonprofit organization with demonstrated experience deploying artificial intelligence technologies or automated decisions systems in the workplace.(10) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules representing a city, county, special district, or local educational agency with demonstrated experience deploying artificial intelligence technologies or automated decisions systems in the workplace.(c) The members of the advisory panel shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.(d) The department, in consultation with the advisory panel, shall perform an assessment of data sources and collection methodologies utilized by federal, state, and local governmental agencies with regards regard to the use and impact of advanced artificial intelligence systems on the labor force and compile a report on existing data collection systems and gaps in data collection.(e) On or before January 1, 2028, the advisory panel shall submit a report to the Legislature on the results of the assessment conducted pursuant to this section. The advisory panel shall transmit the report in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code and post the report on its internet website.(f) (1) The report shall include all of the following:(A) Identification of key questions and data that need to be answered to assess how the introduction of artificial intelligence systems impacts individual workers and labor markets broadly, including, but not limited to, how technology is being introduced in the workplace to manage or replace workers, how worker displacement impacts state revenues, how technology disproportionately impacts demographic groups, and how technology is being used to automate tasks and jobs.(B) Inventory of existing data that the state collects across agencies to analyze developments in technology and their impact on the workforce.(C) Assessment of federal governmental and local governmental data collection systems and how they may be leveraged to assess future workforce developments and issues.(D) Assessment of current data collection partnerships between federal, state, and local governmental agency partners.(E) Assessment of data collection efforts by nongovernmental partners.(F) Assessment of gaps in data collection systems to inform future policy development.(G) Any other assessment and data the advisory panel determines is appropriate.(2) The report shall include policy recommendations to the Legislature that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) How to effectively support workers impacted by artificial intelligence.(B) How to ensure workforce pipelines remain open for positions with expertise.(g) The advisory panel shall be dissolved upon submission of the report required by subdivision (e) to the Legislature.(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.